Maryland, session 2025, HB0875.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–136.
(A) (1) THERE IS A COMMISSION ON HISTORY, CULTURE, AND CIVICS IN
EDUCATION.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE COMMISSION IS TO:
(I) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE STATE BOARD AND THE
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0875*

HOUSE BILL 875
DEPARTMENT TO FURTHER THE DISCOVERY, INTERPRETATION, AND LEARNING OF
THE HISTORY, CULTURE, AND CIVICS OF THE UNITED STATES AND MARYLAND; AND
(II) PROVIDE EQUITABLE LEARNING OUTCOMES REGARDLESS
OF A STUDENT’S FAMILY INCOME, RACE, ETHNICITY, DISABILITY, OR OTHER
CHARACTERISTICS CONSISTENT WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THE BLUEPRINT FOR
MARYLAND’S FUTURE IN § 1–303 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) THE COMMISSION CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS
APPOINTED BY THE GOVERNOR FROM A LIST OF NOMINEES:
(I) TWO MEMBERS REPRESENTING MARYLAND’S INDIGENOUS
AMERICAN TRIBES, WHICH INCLUDE THE LENAPE, NANTICOKE, PISCATAWAY,
CONOY, POWHATAN, ACCOHANNOCK, SHAWNEE, SUSQUEHANNOCK, TUTELO, AND
SAPONI TRIBES, NOMINATED BY THE MARYLAND COMMISSION ON INDIAN AFFAIRS;
(II) TWO MEMBERS REPRESENTING THE MARYLAND
LGBTQIA+ COMMUNITY, ONE OF WHOM IDENTIFIES AS TRANSGENDER,
NOMINATED BY THE MARYLAND LEGISLATIVE LGBTQIA+ CAUCUS;
(III) TWO MEMBERS REPRESENTING THE MARYLAND DISABLED
COMMUNITY, NOMINATED BY THE SECRETARY OF DISABILITIES;
(IV) TWO MEMBERS WHO ARE TEACHERS OR HOLD A TEACHING
LICENSE IN THE STATE:
1. ONE OF WHOM IS NOMINATED BY THE BALTIMORE
TEACHER’S UNION; AND
2. ONE OF WHOM IS NOMINATED BY THE MARYLAND
STATE EDUCATION ASSOCIATION;
(V) TWO MEMBERS REPRESENTING THE MARYLAND LATINO
COMMUNITY, NOMINATED BY THE MARYLAND LEGISLATIVE LATINO CAUCUS;
(VI) TWO MEMBERS REPRESENTING THE MARYLAND AFRICAN
AMERICAN COMMUNITY, NOMINATED BY THE LEGISLATIVE BLACK CAUCUS OF
MARYLAND;
(VII) TWO MEMBERS REPRESENTING THE MARYLAND ASIAN
AMERICAN AND PACIFIC ISLANDER COMMUNITY, NOMINATED BY THE MARYLAND
LEGISLATIVE ASIAN–AMERICAN AND PACIFIC–ISLANDER CAUCUS;

HOUSE BILL 875 3
(VIII) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, TWO
MEMBERS REPRESENTING HIGHER EDUCATION:
1. ONE OF WHOM IS NOMINATED BY THE CHANCELLOR
OF THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND; AND
2. ONE OF WHOM IS NOMINATED BY THE PRESIDENT OF
THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF COMMUNITY COLLEGES; AND
(IX) THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS, OR THE STATE
SUPERINTENDENT’S DESIGNEE.
(2) THE INDIVIDUALS CONSIDERED FOR NOMINATION BY THE
CHANCELLOR OF THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(VIII)1 OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE INDIVIDUALS WHO REPRESENT
HISTORICALLY BLACK COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES IN THE STATE.
(C) (1) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE
COMMISSION SHALL REFLECT THE GENDER, RACIAL, ETHNIC, AND GEOGRAPHIC
DIVERSITY OF THE STATE.
(2) A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION SHALL HAVE
CLASSROOM EXPERIENCE OR EXPERIENCE IN DEVELOPING EDUCATION CONTENT
STANDARDS.
(D) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 4 YEARS.
(2) THE TERMS OF MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS REQUIRED BY THE
TERMS PROVIDED FOR MEMBERS OF THE COMMISSION ON JULY 1, 2025.
(E) THE COMMISSION MEMBERS SHALL ELECT A CHAIR FROM AMONG THE
MEMBERS.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE COMMISSION.
(G) A MEMBER OF THE COMMISSION:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COMMISSION; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.

HOUSE BILL 875
(H) THE COMMISSION SHALL:
(1) EXAMINE THE HISTORY, CULTURE, AND CIVICS OF THE UNITED
STATES AND MARYLAND, INCLUDING:
(I) THE CONTRIBUTIONS OF AMERICAN INDIANS, LATINOS,
AFRICAN AMERICANS, AND ASIAN AMERICANS;
(II) THE CONTRIBUTIONS OF LESBIAN, GAY, BISEXUAL,
TRANSGENDER, AND QUEER INDIVIDUALS WITHIN THE MINORITY GROUPS;
(III) THE INTERSECTIONALITY OF SIGNIFICANT SOCIAL AND
CULTURAL FEATURES WITHIN THE MINORITY COMMUNITIES;
(IV) THE CONTRIBUTIONS AND PERSECUTION OF RELIGIOUS
MINORITIES;
(V) THE CONTRIBUTIONS OF THE MARYLAND DISABLED
COMMUNITY; AND
(VI) THE CONTRIBUTIONS OF WOMEN;
(2) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE STATE BOARD REGARDING
THE ADOPTION OF STANDARDS AND PROGRAMS THAT ACCURATELY REFLECT THE
DISCOVERY, INTERPRETATION, AND LEARNING OF THE HISTORY, CULTURE, AND
CIVICS OF THE UNITED STATES AND MARYLAND;
(3) MAKE ALL ACTIVITIES AND MATERIALS OF THE COMMISSION
AVAILABLE ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE, INCLUDING:
(I) LIVE AND ARCHIVED VIDEO STREAMING OF EACH
COMMISSION MEETING;
(II) MEETING AGENDAS, MATERIALS, AND NOTES; AND
(III) COMMISSION REPORTS; AND
(4) USE MULTIPLE COMMUNICATIONS METHODS TO PROVIDE
UPDATES AND ANNOUNCEMENTS RELATED TO THE COMMISSION.
(I) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 30 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2025, THE
COMMISSION SHALL REPORT ITS FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE STATE
BOARD, THE GOVERNOR, AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE

HOUSE BILL 875 5
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY.
(J) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, THE STATE BOARD SHALL:
(1) REVIEW THE COMMISSION’S FINDINGS AND RECOMMENDATIONS;
AND
(2) MAKE ANY APPROPRIATE CHANGES TO THE EDUCATIONAL
STANDARDS FOR PREKINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE 12.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the initial
members of the Commission on History, Culture, and Civics in Education shall expire as
follows:
(1) the eight members representing the indigenous American tribes,
Maryland Latino community, African American community, and Asian American and
Pacific Islander community in 2027; and
(2) the eight members representing the LGBTQIA+ community, disabled
community, teachers, and higher education in 2029.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.